Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Article 5. Disclosure Statements Required to be Filed.

§ 30-109.
Application.

This article requires disclosure of certain personal and financial interests by legislators.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.39; 2001, c. 844.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Are subject to all applicable provisions of the General Assembly Conflicts Act in their service on the Commission. However, the only transactions for which this Act requires disqualification are transactions with the General Assembly. Thus, the General Assembly Conflicts Act will not come into play for transactions of the Commission, and it will not require any legislator to disqualify himself from transactions of the Commission. A legislator does remain subject to State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act in his capacity as a member of the Commission, and if Act requires him to disqualify himself from a transaction, the savings clause would apply. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-076,
(2/6/15).

§ 30-110.
Disclosure.

In accordance with the requirements set forth in § 30-111.1, every legislator and legislator-elect shall file, as a condition to assuming office, a disclosure statement of his personal interests and such other information as is required on the form prescribed by the Council pursuant to § 30-111 and thereafter shall file such a statement annually on or before February 1. Disclosure forms shall be made available by the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council at least 30 days prior to the filing deadline. Disclosure forms shall be filed electronically with the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council in accordance with the standards approved by it pursuant to § 30-356. The disclosure forms of the members of the General Assembly shall be maintained as public records for five years in the office of the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council. Such forms shall be made public no later than six weeks after the filing deadline.

Candidates for the General Assembly shall file a disclosure statement of their personal interests as required by §§

24.2-500

through

24.2-503

.

Any legislator who has a personal interest in any transaction pending before the General Assembly and who is disqualified from participating in that transaction pursuant to § 30-108 and the rules of his house shall disclose his interest in accordance with the applicable rule of his house.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.40; 2001, c. 844; 2006, c. 779; 2014, cc. 792, 804; 2015, cc. 763, 777; 2016, cc. 773, 774; 2017, cc. 829, 832.

Cross references.

As to records furnished by members of General Assembly, including annual disclosure statements, from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.7

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 792 and 804, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act requiring the filing of disclosure forms with the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and the first of such disclosure forms filed with the Council shall be such disclosure forms required to be filed by December 15, 2015. All filers required to file a disclosure form for any filing period prior to December 15, 2015, shall file such form with the entity currently responsible for accepting such filings in the manner currently accepted by such entity.” Pursuant to the sixth enactment clause of Acts 2014, chapters 792 and 804, the Council is required to receive filings under this section beginning July 1, 2015. Until that time all filings made under this section will be received by the appropriate clerk’s office.

Acts 2014, cc. 792 and 804, cl. 9 provides: “That, except as provided in the seventh enactment of this act, the filing period for all filers required to file a disclosure form on December 15, 2014, shall consist of January 2014 complete through the last day of October 2014.”

Acts 2015, cc. 763 and 777, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act requiring that the disclosure forms prescribed by §§

2.2-426

,

2.2-3117

,

2.2-3118

, and 30-111 of the Code of Virginia be submitted electronically with the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council shall become effective on July 1, 2016.” The fourth sentence of subsection A, as amended by cc. 763 and 777,
is effective July 1, 2016.

Acts 2015, cc. 763 and 777, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2016, except that the provisions of this act amending §§ 30-355, 30-356, and 30-357 shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2015, cc. 763 and 777, cl. 5 provides: “Notwithstanding the sixth enactment of Chapters 792 and 804 of the Acts of Assembly of 2014, that any filer required to file a disclosure form pursuant to §

2.2-3115

shall file such form with the applicable clerk of the governing body of the county, city, or town or the clerk of the school board.”

Effective date.

This section became effective October 1, 2001.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 779 inserted the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 792 and 804, are identical and in subsection A, substituted “semiannually by December 15 for the preceding six-month period complete through the last day of October and by June 15 for the preceding six-month period complete through the last day of April” for “annually on or before January 8” in the first sentence, substituted “Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council at least 30 days prior to the filing deadline” for “clerk of the appropriate house to each legislator and legislator-elect not later than November 30 of each year” in the third sentence, deleted “shall file their disclosure forms with the Clerk of the Senate” following “Members of the Senate” and substituted “Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council” for “Clerk of the House of Delegates” in the fourth sentence, and in the last sentence substituted “Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council” for “clerk of the appropriate house.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 763 and 777, effective January 1, 2016, are identical and in subsection A, substituted “made available” for “provided,” substituted “Disclosure forms shall be filed electronically” for “Members of the Senate and members of the House of Delegates shall file their disclosure forms,” inserted “in accordance with the standards approved by it pursuant to § 30-356,” and added the sixth sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 773 and 774 are identical, and substituted “required on the form prescribed by the Council pursuant to § 30-111 and thereafter shall file such a statement annually on or before January 15” for “specified on the form set forth in § 30-111 and thereafter shall file such a statement semiannually by December 15 for the preceding six-month period complete through the last day of October and by June 15 for the preceding six-month period complete through the last day of April” in subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 829 and 832 are identical, and in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “In accordance with the requirements set forth in § 30-111.1” and substituted “February 1” for “January 15”; deleted the second sentence which read “When the filing deadline falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the disclosure statement shall be filed on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday”; and substituted “the filing deadline” for “filing” at the end of the last sentence.

§ 30-110.1.
Report of gifts.

Every legislator shall file, on or before May 1, a report of gifts accepted or received by him or a member of his immediate family during the period beginning on January 1 complete through adjournment sine die of the regular session of the General Assembly. The gift report shall be on a form prescribed by the Council and shall be filed electronically with the Council in accordance with the standards approved by it pursuant to § 30-356. For purposes of this section, “adjournment sine die” means adjournment on the last legislative day of the regular session and does not include the ensuing reconvened session. Any gifts reported pursuant to this section shall not be listed on the annual disclosure form prescribed by the Council pursuant to § 30-111.

History.

2016, cc. 773, 774.

§ 30-111.
Disclosure form.

The disclosure form to be used for filings required by subsections A and B of § 30-110 shall be prescribed by the Council. All completed forms shall be filed electronically with the Council in accordance with the standards approved by it pursuant to § 30-356.

Any legislator who knowingly and intentionally makes a false statement of a material fact on the Statement of Economic Interests is guilty of a Class 5 felony and shall be subject to disciplinary action for such violations by the house in which the legislator sits.

The Statement of Economic Interests of all members of each house shall be reviewed by the Council. If a legislator’s Statement is found to be inadequate as filed, the legislator shall be notified in writing and directed to file an amended Statement correcting the indicated deficiencies, and a time shall be set within which such amendment shall be filed. If the Statement of Economic Interests, in either its original or amended form, is found to be adequate as filed, the legislator’s filing shall be deemed in full compliance with this section as to the information disclosed thereon.

Ten percent of the membership of a house, on the basis of newly discovered facts, may in writing request the house in which those members sit, in accordance with the rules of that house, to review the Statement of Economic Interests of another member of that house in order to determine the adequacy of his filing. In accordance with the rules of each house, each Statement of Economic Interests shall be promptly reviewed, the adequacy of the filing determined, and notice given in writing to the legislator whose Statement is in issue. Should it be determined that the Statement requires correction, augmentation or revision, the legislator involved shall be directed to make the changes required within such time as shall be set under the rules of each house.If a legislator, after having been notified in writing in accordance with the rules of the house in which he sits that his Statement is inadequate as filed, fails to amend his Statement so as to come into compliance within the time limit set, he shall be subject to disciplinary action by the house in which he sits. No legislator shall vote on any question relating to his own Statement.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.41; 1988, c. 849; 1994, cc. 724, 733, 735, 777, 793; 1995, c. 763; 1996, c. 77; 1997, cc. 577, 844; 1998, c. 732; 2001, c. 844; 2003, c. 610; 2006, cc. 779, 787, 892; 2007, cc. 620, 627; 2010, cc. 418, 474, 670; 2014, cc. 792, 804; 2015, cc. 763, 777; 2016, cc. 773, 774.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 792 and 804, cl. 5 provides: “That the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council shall review the current statutory disclosure forms located at §§

2.2-426

,

2.2-3117

,

2.2-3118

, and 30-111 of the Code of Virginia and promulgate revised forms consistent with the provisions of this act. The Council shall submit its proposed revised forms to the General Assembly on or before November 15, 2015.”

Acts 2014, cc. 792 and 804, cl. 9 provides: “That, except as provided in the seventh enactment of this act, the filing period for all filers required to file a disclosure form on December 15, 2014, shall consist of January 2014 complete through the last day of October 2014.”

Acts 2015, cc. 763 and 777, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act requiring that the disclosure forms prescribed by §§

2.2-426

,

2.2-3117

,

2.2-3118

, and 30-111 of the Code of Virginia be submitted electronically with the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council shall become effective on July 1, 2016.” The second sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection A, as amended by cc. 763 and 777,
is effective July 1, 2016.

Acts 2015, cc. 763 and 777, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council shall review the current statutory disclosure forms located at §§

2.2-426

,

2.2-3117

,

2.2-3118

, and 30-111 of the Code of Virginia and make recommendations for the revision of such forms consistent with the provisions of this act. The Council shall submit its recommendations to the General Assembly on or before November 15, 2016.”

Acts 2015, cc. 763 and 777, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2016, except that the provisions of this act amending §§ 30-355, 30-356, and 30-357 shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2016, cc. 773 and 774, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act eliminating the forms set forth in §§

2.2-426

,

2.2-3117

,

2.2-3118

, and 30-111 of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on January 1, 2017, and that the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council shall prescribe on or before January 1, 2017, the forms required for complying with the disclosure requirements of §§

2.2-426

,

2.2-3117

,

2.2-3118

, and 30-111.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 610, in the Statement of Economic Interests in subsection A, inserted the definition of “Lobbyist relationship” in item 7, inserted “and Lobbyist Relationships,” inserted the 7A description, inserted item 7B, redesignated schedule F as schedule F-1, and inserted schedule F-‘2.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 779, in subsection A, in the “STATEMENT OF ECONOMIC INTERESTS” form, in the paragraph defining “Close financial association,” inserted the language beginning “means an association in which” and ending “through the individual,” inserted the clause designations, deleted “‘Close financial association’ does not include an association based on” preceding clause (ii) and made a related change, inserted “pursuant to an agreement between you and such businesses, or between persons with whom you have a close financial association and such businesses” in paragraph 8C; in the “SCHEDULES to STATEMENT OF ECONOMIC INTERESTS” form, added the last sentence in the first paragraph of Schedule C, deleted the column headed “More than $50,000” and added the columns headed “$50,001 to $250,000” and “More than $250,000” in the tables in Schedules C and F-1, in Schedule F-2, added the column heading “Payments to Lobbyist” and the columns headed “$10,000 or less” and “More than $10,001,” added the paragraph following the table in Schedule G-1, and inserted “pursuant to an agreement between you and such businesses, or between persons with whom you have a close financial association and such businesses” in Schedule G-3.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 787 and 892 are identical, and substituted “Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.)” for “Chapter 9 (§

24.2-900

et seq.)”
in Schedule E of the disclosure form in subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 620 substituted “occurrence” for “occurence” in the definition for “Contingent liability”; added subdivision A 11; added the -1 designation following Schedule D,
substituted “Do not list” for “List” and “(See Schedule D-2 for such payments or reimbursements)” for “only for meetings or travel outside the Commonwealth” in that Schedule; and added Schedule D-2.

The 2007 amendment by c. 627 added the last sentence in subdivision A 8C; in Schedule G-3, deleted “REPRESENTATION AND” in the heading and added the last sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 418 and 474 are nearly identical, and substituted “(Exclude any salary received as a member of the General Assembly pursuant to § 30-19.11.)” for “(Exclude state or local government or advisory agencies.)” in number 6 of the form.

The 2010 amendment by c. 670 substituted “Each parcel must be listed individually.” for “You may list each parcel of real estate individually if you wish.” in Schedule H.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 792 and 804 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by cc. 763 and 777, effective January 1, 2016, are identical and in subsection A, substituted “similar to the following” for “as follows,” and added the second sentence; in the definition for “Gift,” inserted clauses (vi) through (xiii) and, in clause (xiv) inserted “or first cousin” and “step-parent, step-grandparent, step-grandchild, stepbrother, or step-sister” deleted “or (c) a person, organization, or business who is a party to or is seeking to become a party to a contract with the Commonwealth. For purposes of this definition, ‘person, organization, or business’ includes individuals who are officers, directors, or owners of or who have a controlling ownership interest in such organization or business” following “2.2-419”; substituted “other person” for “child” in the definition for “Immediate family”; substituted “$100” for “$200” in subdivisions 4 and 11 and in Schedule D-1; substituted “$50” for “$100” in subdivision 5 and in Schedule E; substituted “June” for “January” in subdivision 11; rewrote the signature line and Schedule I B; and in subsection B inserted “knowingly and intentionally,” substituted “false statement” for “knowing misstatement” and inserted “is guilty of a Class 5 felony and.” The second sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection A, as amended by cc. 763 and 777, was effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 773 and 774, effective January 1, 2017, are identical and in subsection A, substituted “prescribed by the Council” for “substantially similar to the following” at the end of the first sentence and deleted the form.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Lobbyist relationship. —

If a “lobbyist relationship” as defined by § 30-111 arises in the context of an election campaign, the separate disclosure requirement of § 30-111 for members and members-elect of the General Assembly applies irrespective of any disclosure the Campaign Finance Disclosure Act of 2006 may require of the campaign committee for the member or member-elect. A “lobbyist relationship” is not established when a person who has registered as a lobbyist provides volunteer assistance to the election campaign of a member or member-elect if the nature of that assistance is not within the scope of the lobbyist’s usual occupation in legal, consulting or public relations services. See opinion of Attorney General
to The Honorable William M. Stanley, Member, Senate of Virginia, 13-108, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 102 (12/27/13).

§ 30-111.1.
Disclosure form; filing requirements.

A legislator or legislator-elect required to file an annual disclosure on or before February 1 pursuant to this article shall disclose his personal interests and other information as required on the form prescribed by the Council for the preceding calendar year complete through December 31. A legislator or legislator-elect required to file a disclosure as a condition to assuming office shall file such disclosure on or before the day such office is assumed and disclose his personal interests and other information as required on the form prescribed by the Council for the preceding 12-month period complete through the last day of the month immediately preceding the month in which the office is assumed; however, any legislator or legislator-elect who assumes office in January shall be required to only file an annual disclosure on or before February 1 for the preceding calendar year complete through December 31.

When the deadline for filing any disclosure pursuant to this article falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the deadline for filing shall be the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

History.

2017, cc. 829, 832.

§ 30-112.
Senate and House Ethics Advisory Panels; membership; terms; quorum; compensation and expenses.

The Senate Ethics Advisory Panel and the House Ethics Advisory Panel are established in the legislative branch of state government. The provisions of §§ 30-112 through 30-119 shall be applicable to each panel.

The Senate Ethics Advisory Panel shall be composed of five nonlegislative citizen members: three of whom shall be former members of the Senate; and two of whom shall be citizens of the Commonwealth at large who have not previously held such office. All members of the Panel shall be citizens of the Commonwealth. No member shall engage in activities requiring him to register as a lobbyist under §

2.2-422

during his tenure on the Panel.The members shall be nominated by the Committee on Rules of the Senate and confirmed by the Senate by a majority vote of (i) the members present of the majority party and (ii) the members present of the minority party. After initial appointments, all appointments shall be for terms of four years each except for unexpired terms. Nominations shall be made so as to assure bipartisan representation on the Panel.

The House Ethics Advisory Panel shall be composed of five nonlegislative citizen members: one of whom shall be a retired justice or judge of a court of record; two of whom shall be former members of the House of Delegates; and two of whom shall be citizens of the Commonwealth at large, at least one of whom shall not have previously held such office. All members of the Panel shall be citizens of the Commonwealth. No member shall engage in activities requiring him to register as a lobbyist under §

2.2-422

during his tenure on the Panel.The members shall be nominated by the Speaker of the House of Delegates and confirmed by the House of Delegates by a majority vote of (i) the members present of the majority party and (ii) the members present of the minority party. After initial appointments, all appointments shall be for terms of four years each except for unexpired terms. Nominations shall be made so as to assure bipartisan representation on the Panel.

Each panel shall elect its own chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership.

No member shall serve more than three successive four-year terms. Vacancies shall be filled only for the unexpired term. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment.

Three members shall constitute a quorum on each panel. A vacancy shall not impair the right of the remaining members to exercise all powers of the Panel. Meetings of each panel shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

The members of each panel, while serving on the business of the Panel, are performing legislative duties and shall be entitled to the compensation and reimbursement of expenses to which members of the General Assembly are entitled when performing legislative duties pursuant to §§

2.2-2813

,

2.2-2825

, and 30-19.12. Funding for the cost of compensation and expenses of the members of the Senate Ethics Advisory Panel shall be provided by the Office of the Clerk of the Senate and the funding for the cost of compensation and expenses of the House Ethics Advisory Panel shall be provided by the Office of the Clerk of the House of Delegates.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, §§ 2.1-639.42, 2.1-639.43, 2.1-639.44, 2.1-639.51; 1992, c. 443; 2001, c. 844; 2004, c. 1000; 2010, c. 876; 2014, cc. 792, 804.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “§

2.2-422

” has been substituted for “§

24.2-422

” in subsections B and C as set out above in order to correct an error in the 2010 act.

Effective date.

This section became effective October 1, 2001.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 substituted “established in the legislative branch of state government” for “continued” in subsection A; in subsection B, in the first paragraph, inserted “nonlegislative citizen” and “at large” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence, and in the second paragraph, substituted “Rules” for “Privileges and Elections”; in the first paragraph of subsection C, in the first sentence, inserted “nonlegislative citizen,” “of Delegates” and “at large,” and added the last sentence; added “and vice-chairman from among its membership” in subsection D; added the last two sentences in subsection E; in subsection F, in the first sentence, inserted “shall” and substituted “on each panel” for “of the Panel,” and added the last sentence; and in subsection G, rewrote the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 876 added the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection B; and added the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection C.

The 2014 amendments

The 2014 amendments by cc. 792 and 804 are identical, and added “by a majority vote of (i) the members present of the majority party and (ii) the members present of the minority party” at the end of the first sentence of the second paragraph in subsection B; and added “by a majority vote of (i) the members present of the majority party and (ii) the members present of the minority party” at the end of the first sentence of the second paragraph in subsection C.

§ 30-113.
Powers and duties of Panel.

The powers and duties of the Panel shall be applied and used only in relation to members of the respective house of the General Assembly for which it is created. The Panel shall establish its rules of procedure, including rules for the conduct of open meetings and hearings.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.45; 2001, c. 844; 2010, c. 876.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 876 deleted the former second and third sentences, which read: “In addition to the other powers and duties specified in this article the Panel has the power to organize and preserve statements and reports filed with the Panel for a period of five years from the date of receipt. At the end of the five-year period, these documents may be destroyed.”; added the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection B; and added the last sentence.

§ 30-113.1.
Records.

If a complaint is dismissed during the preliminary investigation, such records shall remain confidential and be retained for a period of five years and then destroyed. Records related to a complaint that has proceeded to an inquiry beyond a preliminary investigation shall be made available to the public and retained in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Public Records Act (§

42.1-76

et seq.).

History.

2010, c. 876.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 30-114.
Filing of complaints; procedures; disposition.

In response to the signed and sworn complaint of any citizen of the Commonwealth, which is subscribed by the maker as true under penalty of perjury, submitted to the Panel, the Panel shall inquire into any alleged violation of Articles 2 (§ 30-102 et seq.) through 5 (§ 30-109 et seq.) by any member of the respective house of the General Assembly in his current term or his immediate prior term. Complaints shall be filed with the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council, which shall promptly (i) submit the complaint to the chairman of the appropriate Panel and (ii) forward a copy of the complaint to the legislator named in the complaint. The chairman shall promptly notify the Panel of the complaint. No complaint shall be filed with the Panel 60 or fewer days before a primary election or other nominating event or before a general election in which the cited legislator is running for office, and the Panel shall not accept or act on any complaint received during this period.

The Panel shall determine, during its preliminary investigation, whether the facts stated in the complaint taken as true are sufficient to show a violation of Articles 2 (§ 30-102 et seq.) through 5 (§ 30-109 et seq.). If the facts, as stated in the complaint, fail to give rise to such a violation, then the Panel shall dismiss the complaint. If the facts, as stated in the complaint, give rise to such a violation, then the Panel shall request that the complainant appear and testify under oath as to the complaint and the allegations therein. After hearing the testimony and reviewing any other evidence provided by the complainant, the Panel shall dismiss the complaint if the Panel fails to find by a preponderance of the evidence that such violation has occurred. If the Panel finds otherwise, it shall proceed with the inquiry.

If after such preliminary investigation, the Panel determines to proceed with an inquiry into the conduct of any legislator, the Panel (i) shall immediately notify in writing the individual who filed the complaint and the cited legislator as to the fact of the inquiry and the charges against the legislator and (ii) shall schedule one or more hearings on the matter. The legislator shall have the right to present evidence, cross-examine witnesses, face and examine the accuser, and be represented by counsel at any hearings. In its discretion, the Panel may grant the legislator any other rights or privileges not specifically enumerated in this subsection. Once the Panel has determined to proceed with an inquiry, its meetings and hearings shall be open to the public.

Once the Panel determines to proceed with an inquiry into the conduct of any legislator, the Panel shall complete its investigations and dispose of the matter as provided in § 30-116 notwithstanding the resignation of the legislator during the course of the Panel’s proceedings.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.46; 2001, c. 844; 2003, c. 649; 2010, c. 876; 2014, cc. 792, 804.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 649 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 876 rewrote the section.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 792 and 804 are identical, and deleted “of this chapter” following “(§ 30-109 et seq.)” in subsections A and B, and substituted “Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council, which” for “Director of the Division of Legislative Services, who” in subsection A.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 30-115.
Subpoenas.

The Panel may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents, books or other records. The Panel may apply to the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond to compel obedience to the subpoenas of the Panel. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, every state and local governmental agency, and units and subdivisions thereof shall make available to the Panel any documents, records, data, statements or other information, except tax returns or information relating thereto, which the Panel designates as being necessary for the exercise of its powers and duties.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.47; 2001, c. 844.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

§ 30-116.
Disposition of cases.

Within 120 days of the chairman’s forwarding the signed and sworn complaint to the Panel, the Panel, or a majority of its members acting in its name, shall dispose of the matter in one of the following ways:

If the Panel determines in its preliminary investigation that the complaint is without merit, the Panel shall dismiss the complaint, so advise the complainant and legislator, and take no further action. In such case, the Panel shall retain its records and findings in confidence unless the legislator under inquiry requests in writing that the records and findings be made public.

If the Panel determines in the course of its proceedings that the facts and evidence show that the complaint is without merit, the Panel shall dismiss the complaint, so advise the complainant and legislator, and report its action to the Clerk of the appropriate house, for the information of the House or Senate.

If the Panel determines that there is a reasonable basis to conclude that the legislator has violated the provisions of this chapter but that the violation was not made knowingly, the Panel shall refer the matter by a written report setting forth its findings and the reasons therefor to the appropriate house of the General Assembly for appropriate action. All Panel reports, which are advisory only, shall be delivered to the Clerk of the appropriate house, who shall refer the report to the Committee on Privileges and Elections in accordance with the rules of the appropriate house. Said Committee shall in all cases report, after due hearings and consideration, its determination of the matter and its recommendations and reasons for its resolves to the appropriate house. If the Committee deems disciplinary action warranted, it shall report a resolution to express such action. The appropriate house as a whole shall then consider the resolution, and if it finds the legislator in violation of any provision of this chapter, it may by recorded vote take such disciplinary action as it deems warranted.

If the Panel determines that there is a reasonable basis to conclude that the legislator knowingly violated any provision of Article 2 (§ 30-102 et seq.), 3 (§ 30-104 et seq.), 4 (§ 30-107 et seq.) or 5 (§ 30-109 et seq.) of this chapter, except § 30-108 or subsection C of § 30-110, it shall refer the matter by a written report setting forth its findings and the reasons therefor to the Attorney General for such action he deems appropriate. The Panel shall also file its report with the Clerk of the appropriate house, who shall refer the report in accordance with the rules of his house. In the event the Attorney General determines not to prosecute the alleged violation, he shall notify the Clerk of the appropriate house of his determination and the Clerk shall send the report to the Committee on Privileges and Elections. The matter shall thereafter be handled in accordance with the provisions of subdivision 2.

If the Panel determines that there is a reasonable basis to conclude that the legislator has violated § 30-108 or subsection C of § 30-110, it shall refer the matter by a written report to the appropriate house pursuant to subdivision 2. As its first order of business other than organizational matters and committee work, the house in which the member sits shall immediately upon the convening of the next regular or special session take up and dispose of the matter by taking one or more of the following actions: (i) dismiss the complaint; (ii) sustain the complaint and reprimand the member; (iii) sustain the complaint, censure the member, and strip the member of his seniority; (iv) sustain the complaint and expel the member by a two-thirds vote of the elected members; (v) in the event the house finds a knowing violation, it shall refer the matter to the Attorney General pursuant to subdivision 3.

The Panel shall make public any report that it makes pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 1 b, 2, 3 or 4 on the date it refers its report.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.48; 2001, c. 844; 2003, c. 649; 2010, cc. 427, 876.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 649 inserted “so advise the complainant” in the first sentence of subdivision 1.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 427 substituted “shall refer the matter” for “may refer the matter” near the end of subdivision 4.

The 2010 amendment by c. 876, in the introductory language substituted “forwarding the” for “receiving a” following “chairman’s” and inserted “to the Panel” following “complaint”; inserted the clause 1 a designation; inserted “in its preliminary investigation” and “and legislator” in clause 1 a; added clause 1 b; and in subdivision 5, substituted “makes” for “refers” and inserted “1 b” following “subdivision”.

§ 30-117.
Confidentiality of proceedings.

All proceedings during the investigation of any complaint by the Panel shall be confidential. This rule of confidentiality shall apply to Panel members and their staff, the Committee on Privileges and Elections and its staff, and the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.49; 2001, c. 844; 2014, cc. 792, 804.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 792 and 804 are identical, and inserted “and the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council” and made a related change.

§ 30-118.
Staff for Panel.

The Panel may hire staff and outside counsel to assist the Panel and to conduct examinations of witnesses, subject to the approval of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate for the Senate Ethics Advisory Panel and subject to the approval of the Speaker of the House of Delegates for the House Ethics Advisory Panel.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.50; 2001, c. 844; 2010, c. 876; 2014, cc. 792, 804.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 876 rewrote the section.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 792 and 804 are identical, and deleted the second sentence, which read: “The Panel may have the Director of the Division of Legislative Services, and such additional staff as he may assign, assist the Panel during its preliminary investigation and during its proceedings.”

§ 30-119.
Jurisdiction of Panel.

The Senate and House Ethics Advisory Panels shall have jurisdiction over any complaint alleging a violation of Articles 2 (§ 30-102 et seq.) through 5 (§ 30-109 et seq.) of this chapter that occurs on or after August 1, 1987, and over any complaint alleging a violation of the Comprehensive Conflict of Interests Act occurring after July 1, 1984, and prior to August 1, 1987.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.52; 2001, c. 844.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

§ 30-120.
Senate and House Committees on Standards of Conduct.

Either house of the General Assembly may establish, in its rules, a Committee on Standards of Conduct to be appointed as provided in its rules and consisting of three members, one of whom shall be a member of the minority party. The Committee shall consider any request by a member of its house for an advisory opinion as to whether the facts in a particular case would constitute a violation of the provisions of this chapter and may consider other matters assigned to it pursuant to the rules of its house.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.53; 2001, c. 844.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

§ 30-121.
Adoption of rules governing procedures and disciplinary sanctions.

Each house of the General Assembly shall adopt rules governing procedures and disciplinary sanctions for members who have committed alleged violations of this chapter.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.53:1; 2001, c. 844.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.